Nebraska, session 109, LB995.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-272, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-272 (1)(a) In counties having a population of less than one
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants:
(i) When any juvenile court petition is filed alleging jurisdiction
of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 43-247, counsel
shall be appointed for such juvenile; and
(ii) In any other instance in which a juvenile is brought without
counsel before a juvenile court, the court shall advise such juvenile and
his or her parent or guardian of their right to retain counsel and shall
inquire of such juvenile and his or her parent or guardian as to whether
they desire to retain counsel.
(1)(a) When (b) In counties having a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more inhabitants, when any juvenile court petition is filed
alleging jurisdiction of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3)
(b), or (4) of section 43-247, counsel shall be appointed for such
juvenile. At any subsequent hearing or proceeding before the juvenile
court concerning such allegations, such juvenile shall have the right to
counsel appointed under this subsection.
(b) In any case not described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section,
if a juvenile is brought without counsel before a juvenile court, the
court shall advise such juvenile and his or her parent or guardian of
their right to retain counsel and shall inquire of such juvenile and his
or her parent or guardian as to whether they desire to retain counsel.
(c) The court shall inform any juvenile described in subdivision (1)
(a) of this section this subsection and his or her parent or guardian of
such juvenile's right to counsel at county expense if none of them is
able to afford counsel. If the juvenile or his or her parent or guardian
desires to have counsel appointed for such juvenile, or the parent or
guardian of such juvenile cannot be located, and the court ascertains
that none of such persons are able to afford an attorney, the court shall
-2-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
forthwith appoint an attorney to represent such juvenile for all
proceedings before the juvenile court, except that if an attorney is
appointed to represent such juvenile and the court later determines that
a parent of such juvenile is able to afford an attorney, the court shall
order such parent or juvenile to pay for services of the attorney to be
collected in the same manner as provided by section 43-290. If the parent
willfully refuses to pay any such sum, the court may commit him or her
for contempt, and execution may issue at the request of the appointed
attorney or the county attorney or by the court without a request.
(2) The court, on its own motion or upon application of a party to
the proceedings, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the juvenile: (a)
If the juvenile has no parent or guardian of his or her person or if the
parent or guardian of the juvenile cannot be located or cannot be brought
before the court; (b) if the parent or guardian of the juvenile is
excused from participation in all or any part of the proceedings; (c) if
the parent is a juvenile or an incompetent; (d) if the parent is
indifferent to the interests of the juvenile; or (e) in any proceeding
pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247.
A guardian ad litem shall have the duty to protect the interests of
the juvenile for whom he or she has been appointed guardian, and shall be
deemed a parent of the juvenile as to those proceedings with respect to
which his or her guardianship extends.
(3) The court shall appoint an attorney as guardian ad litem. A
guardian ad litem shall act as his or her own counsel and as counsel for
the juvenile, unless there are special reasons in a particular case why
the guardian ad litem or the juvenile or both should have separate
counsel. In such cases the guardian ad litem shall have the right to
counsel, except that the guardian ad litem shall be entitled to appointed
counsel without regard to his or her financial ability to retain counsel.
Whether such appointed counsel shall be provided at the cost of the
county shall be determined as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
-3-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
(4) By July 1, 2015, the Supreme Court shall provide by court rule
standards for guardians ad litem for juveniles in juvenile court
proceedings.
(5) By July 1, 2017, the Supreme Court shall provide guidelines
setting forth standards for all attorneys who practice in juvenile court.
Sec. 2. Section 43-279, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-279 (1) The adjudication portion of hearings shall be conducted
before the court without a jury, applying the customary rules of evidence
in use in trials without a jury. When the petition alleges the juvenile
to be within the provisions of subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 and the juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian appears with or without counsel, the court shall:
(a) Inform inform the parties:
(i) (a) Of the nature of the proceedings and the possible
consequences or dispositions pursuant to sections 43-284 to 43-286,
43-289, and 43-290 that may apply to the juvenile's case following an
adjudication of jurisdiction;
(ii) (b) Of such juvenile's right to counsel as provided in sections
43-272 and 43-273;
(iii) (c) Of the privilege against self-incrimination by advising
the juvenile, parent, guardian, or custodian that the juvenile may remain
silent concerning the charges against the juvenile and that anything said
may be used against the juvenile;
(iv) (d) Of the right to confront anyone who testifies against the
juvenile and to cross-examine any persons who appear against the
juvenile;
(v) (e) Of the right of the juvenile to testify and to compel other
witnesses to attend and testify in his or her own behalf;
(vi) (f) Of the right of the juvenile to a speedy adjudication
hearing; and
-4-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
(vii) (g) Of the right to appeal and have a transcript for such
purpose; and .
(b) Provide each such person with written materials explaining the
juvenile's right to counsel. Such materials shall be written at a level
understandable to the juvenile and shall be developed using best
practices designed to ensure comprehension by the juvenile.
(2) After informing the parties and providing the written materials
as required by subsection (1) of this section giving such warnings and
admonitions, the court may accept an in-court admission or answer of no
contest by the juvenile of all or any part of the allegations in the
petition if the court has determined from examination of the juvenile and
those present that such admission or answer of no contest is
intelligently, voluntarily, and understandingly made and with an
affirmative waiver of rights and that a factual basis for such admission
or answer of no contest exists. The waiver of the right to counsel shall
satisfy section 43-3102. The court may base its adjudication provided in
subsection (3) (2) of this section on such admission or answer of no
contest.
(3) (2) If the juvenile denies the petition or stands mute the court
shall first allow a reasonable time for preparation if needed and then
consider only the question of whether the juvenile is a person described
by section 43-247. After hearing the evidence on such question, the court
shall make a finding and adjudication, to be entered on the records of
the court, whether or not the juvenile is a person described by
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 based upon proof
beyond a reasonable doubt. If an Indian child is involved, the standard
of proof shall be in compliance with the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare
Act, if applicable.
(4) (3) If the court shall find that the juvenile named in the
petition is not within the provisions of section 43-247, it shall dismiss
the case. If the court finds that the juvenile named in the petition is
-5-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
such a juvenile, it shall make and enter its findings and adjudication
accordingly, designating which subdivision or subdivisions of section
43-247 such juvenile is within; the court shall allow a reasonable time
for preparation if needed and then proceed to an inquiry into the proper
disposition to be made of such juvenile.
Sec. 3. Section 43-3102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-3102 (1) In any court proceeding, any waiver of the right to
counsel by a juvenile shall be made in open court, shall be recorded, and
shall be confirmed in a writing signed by the juvenile.
(2) A court shall not accept a juvenile's waiver of the right to
counsel unless:
(a) The the waiver satisfies subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The waiver and is an affirmative waiver that is made
intelligently, voluntarily, and understandingly. In determining whether
such waiver was made intelligently, voluntarily, and understandingly, the
court shall consider, among other things: (i) (a) The age, intelligence,
and education of the juvenile, (ii) (b) the juvenile's emotional
stability, and (iii) (c) the complexity of the proceedings; and .
(c) The juvenile has been provided the written materials required by
subdivision (1)(b) of section 43-279.
(3) On or before July 1, 2022, the Supreme Court shall provide, by
court rule, a process to ensure that a juvenile has consulted with
counsel, and if not, is provided the opportunity to consult with counsel
prior to the juvenile exercising their right to waive their right to
counsel.
(4) The court shall ensure that a juvenile represented by an
attorney consults with his or her attorney before any waiver of counsel.
(5) No parent, guardian, custodian, or other person may waive the
juvenile's right to counsel.
(6) A juvenile's right to be represented by counsel may not be
-6-

LB995 LB995
2026 2026
waived in the following circumstances:
(a) If the juvenile is under the age of fourteen;
(b) For a detention hearing;
(c) For any dispositional hearing where out-of-home placement is
sought; or
(d) If there is a motion to transfer the juvenile from juvenile
court to county court or district court.
Sec. 4. Original sections 43-272, 43-279, and 43-3102, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-